apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
    <pardef n="i__vblex">
      <e><p><l>i</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>us</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ita</l>              <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itaj</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itan</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>itajn</l>            <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ata</l>              <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ataj</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atan</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>atajn</l>            <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onta</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ontaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inta</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>intaj</l>            <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ante</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inte</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igi</l>              <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igas</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igis</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igos</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igus</l>             <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igus</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igita</l>            <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitaj</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitan</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igitajn</l>          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igata</l>            <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igataj</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igatan</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igatajn</l>          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igatan</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igonta</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igontaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginta</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igintaj</l>          <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igante</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iginte</l>           <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>igu</l>              <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igitaj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igita</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igataj</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>igata</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="igi"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ite</l>       <r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="afiŝi">                          <i>afiŝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="akcizi">                         <i>akciz</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="almiksi">                        <i>almiks</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="amputi">                         <i>amput</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="apostati">                       <i>apostat</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ascendi">                        <i>ascend</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aŭrori">                         <i>aŭror</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bei">                            <i>be</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blufi">                          <i>bluf</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="brokanti">                       <i>brokant</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="centralizi">                     <i>centraliz</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉirkaŭtranĉi">                   <i>ĉirkaŭtranĉ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="defii">                          <i>defi</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="delekti">                        <i>delekt</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="destini">                        <i>destin</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="difuzi">                         <i>difuz</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dispersi">                       <i>dispers</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="duonkompreni">                   <i>duonkompren</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ekstrapoli">                     <i>ekstrapol</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="enmiksi">                        <i>enmiks</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="favorkori">                      <i>favorkor</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="foldi">                          <i>fold</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="friti">                          <i>frit</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="girlandi">                       <i>girland</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="harpuni">                        <i>harpun</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impeti">                         <i>impet</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="interkapti">                     <i>interkapt</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kalejdoskopi">                   <i>kalejdoskop</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kaŭzikomplekson">                <i>kaŭzikomplekso</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="komedii">                        <i>komedi</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konsigni">                       <i>konsign</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kultivi">                        <i>kultiv</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="langvori">                       <i>langvor</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="malagrafi">                      <i>malagraf</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="manifestacii">                   <i>manifestaci</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="miniaturi">                      <i>miniatur</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neni">                           <i>nen</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ovri">                           <i>ovr</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pigri">                          <i>pigr</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="postgrumbli">                    <i>postgrumbl</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="proskribi">                      <i>proskrib</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="regresi">                        <i>regres</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="revizii">                        <i>revizi</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="saldi">                          <i>sald</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skarifiki">                      <i>skarifik</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="splendi">                        <i>splend</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="studi">                          <i>stud</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tangi">                          <i>tang</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="travadi">                        <i>travad</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="viatiki">                        <i>viatik</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
